lrec2010_examples/test.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +mas +fem +sg +pl ^GN1 ^GN2 ^GN3 ^GN4
LEXICON Root
alerta Noun1;
anatema  Noun1;
archimandrita  Noun1;
aroma  Noun1;a
autómata  Noun1;
axioma  Noun1;
bolsista  Noun1;
cablegrama  Noun1;
cagatinta  Noun1;
carisma  Noun1;
carota  Noun1;
cartelista  Noun1;
carterista  Noun1;
cinerama  Noun1;
cisma  Noun1;
clima  Noun1;
cometa  Noun1;
corneta  Noun1;
crucigrama  Noun1;
delta  Noun1;
diafragma  Noun1;
diagrama  Noun1;
diploma  Noun1;
dogma  Noun1;
drama  Noun1;
eccema  Noun1;
eczema  Noun1;
emblema  Noun1;
enigma  Noun1;
epigrama  Noun1;
esquema  Noun1;
estigma  Noun1;
fantasma  Noun1;
fonema  Noun1;
franquista  Noun1;
huelguista  Noun1;
idioma  Noun1;
imperialista  Noun1;
jesuita  Noun1;
lama  Noun1;
lema  Noun1;
librecambista  Noun1;
mapa  Noun1;
organigrama  Noun1;
panorama  Noun1;
papa  Noun1;
paradigma  Noun1;
pentagrama  Noun1;
planeta  Noun1;
plasma  Noun1;
poema  Noun1;
poeta  Noun1;
prisma  Noun1;
problema  Noun1;
profeta  Noun1;
programa  Noun1;
proteccionista  Noun1;
racionalista  Noun1;
radiograma  Noun1;
realista  Noun1;
reuma  Noun1;
sátrapa  Noun1;
seminarista  Noun1;
síntoma  Noun1;
sistema  Noun1;
taita  Noun1;
tecnócrata  Noun1;
telefonema  Noun1;
telegrama  Noun1;
tema  Noun1;
teorema  Noun1;
trauma  Noun1;
trompeta  Noun1;
ultravioleta  Noun1;
violeta  Noun1;
waterpolista  Noun1;

LEXICON Noun1
+N+mas:0 Apl;

LEXICON Apl
+sg:0 #;
+pl:^s  #;
